District of Columbia statutes.
35-208

Reciprocal transfer and trackage agreements.

Every street railway in the District of Columbia whose lines connect, or whose lines may, after August 2, 1894, connect, with the lines of any other street-railway company, is hereby required to make reciprocal transfer arrangements with such street-railway companies, and to furnish such facilities therefor as the public convenience may require, and to enter into reciprocal trackage arrangements with such connecting roads. The schedules and compensation shall be mutually agreed upon between the said railway companies, and in case of failure to reach such mutual agreement, the matter in dispute shall be determined by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon petition filed by either party.

Aug. 2, 1894, 28 Stat. 218, ch. 189, § 5
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(40)
1973 Ed., § 44-208.
1981 Ed., § 44-208.